California statutes. Unemployment Insurance Code
(3) All high road grants and programming shall be evaluated using criteria, metrics, and data that include, but are not limited to, information pertaining to the ability of grantees and program administrators to conduct and complete relevant programming as demonstrated through appropriate quantitative and qualitative analysis, including the use of appropriate outcome metrics.

(4) For
 funds and grants providing direct high road workforce, training, and education services to individuals, the board shall report all of the following:

(A) Who is receiving the services, including data on the demographics of the individuals receiving services.

(B) The nature of the services received collected at the individual level.

(C) Data pertaining to participant program and employment outcomes of individuals receiving services including:

(i) The employment rates of individuals served to measure initial job placement and retention over time.

(ii) The wages and wage growth of
 individuals served during and after program participation.

(5) Recognizing that the outcome data specified in this section frequently lags program implementation activities,
 a quantitative report consistent with the requirements of this section shall be provided to the Legislature by the board, after it receives and administers funding under the relevant budget allocations, by October 1 of even-numbered years utilizing whatever program participant and outcome data is available. The report shall also include, but not be limited to, the number of grants awarded, the average award amounts, geographic distribution of awards, and types of industries awarded.

(6) Evaluation reports for all high road grants and programs
 as required by subdivision (t) of Section 14013 shall be provided to the Legislature after all available labor market outcome data specified in this section becomes available on the timeline prescribed in subdivision (t) of Section 14013.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 83, Sec. 23.   (SB 171)   Effective July 13, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

14015.

Members of the board may receive up to one hundred dollars ($100) for each day’s actual attendance at meetings and other official business of the board, not to exceed three hundred dollars ($300) per month, and shall receive their necessary and actual expenses incurred in the performance of their official duties.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 630, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2007.   See conditional termination clause in Section 14007.)
-------------------------------------------

14017.

(a) In efforts to expand job training and employment for allied health professions, the California Workforce Development Board, in consultation with the Division of Apprenticeship Standards, shall do the following:

(1) Identify opportunities for “earn and learn” job training opportunities that meet the industry’s workforce demands and that are in high road, high-demand jobs.

(2) Identify and develop specific requirements and qualifications for entry into “earn and learn” job training models.

(3) Establish standards for “earn and learn” job training programs that are outcome oriented and accountable. The standards shall measure the results from program participation, including a measurement of how many complete the program with an industry-recognized credential that certifies that the individual is ready to enter the specific allied health profession for which the individual has been trained.

(4) Develop means to identify, assess, and prepare a pool of qualified candidates seeking to enter “earn and learn” job training models.

(b) (1) The board, on or before December 1, 2015, shall
 prepare and submit to the appropriate policy committees of the Legislature a report on the findings and recommendations of the board.

(2) The requirement for submitting a report imposed pursuant to this subdivision is inoperative on January 1, 2019, pursuant to Section 10231.5 of the Government Code.

(c) (1) The Department of Consumer Affairs shall engage in a stakeholder process to update policies and remove barriers to facilitate the development of earn and learn training programs in the allied health professions, including barriers identified in the report prepared by the board pursuant to subdivision (b), entitled Expanding Earn and Learn Models in the California Health Care Industry. The stakeholder process shall include all of the following:

(A) The department convening allied health
 workforce stakeholders, which shall include, but are not limited to, the department’s relevant licensure boards, the Division of Apprenticeship Standards, representatives appointed by the board of governors from the California community college system, the California Workforce Development Board, and the State Department of Public Health, and which may include other relevant entities such as the Office of Statewide Health Planning and Development, employer and worker representatives, and community-based organizations.

(B) Addressing issues that include, but are not limited to, prelicensure classifications in allied health occupations that would allow students, in a supervised setting, to gain experience in their chosen field before obtaining licensure, and the payment of wages while in a workplace-based training program.

(C) The department ensuring that existing standards of
 consumer protection are maintained.

(D) Sharing any statutory barriers identified through this process with the relevant committees of the Legislature.

(2) The process described in paragraph (1) shall be completed by, and this subdivision shall be inoperative on, January 1, 2020.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 78, Sec. 17.   (AB 138)   Effective July 16, 2021.   See conditional termination clause in Section 14007.)
-------------------------------------------

14017.1.

(a) To ensure that job training services investments are linked to regional labor market demand and provide opportunities for upward mobility, the board and the Employment Development Department shall work collaboratively to measure and report on training-related job placement outcomes for individuals receiving job training services provided through the workforce system, including all job training services funded by Title I of the federal Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act (Pub. L. 113-128) and through grants administered by the board, regardless of the source of the moneys.

(b) For purposes of measuring training-related job placement outcomes, gathering data to report, and otherwise fulfilling subdivision (a), the board and the
 Employment Development Department shall work collaboratively to create a plan to use the existing unemployment insurance tax data collection infrastructure used to secure quarterly wage data from employers, to match relevant employee occupational data, employee place of employment data, and employee hours worked data, to persons who enroll in job training services. The plan shall include timelines, budget, funding constraints, and an outline of any additional recommended or necessary statutory changes to collect relevant data. The plan shall also outline the means for all of the following:

(1) Requiring local workforce development boards and grantees of board-administered grants to collect and report industry and occupation-specific data for all persons who enroll in job training services, including through the use of case management and performance reporting systems deployed for state and federal data collection and reporting.

(2) Developing and implementing a method to measure the second- and fourth-quarter prior earnings of a person, who is enrolled in a job training service, for purposes of measuring the person’s increase in earnings following their participation in and exit from a program.

(3) Developing and implementing a means to measure wage and employment outcomes for a person following that person’s participation in a job training service during the second, fourth, eighth, and twelfth quarters following participation in and exit from a program for purposes of measuring the person’s increase in earnings over time.

(4) Calculating, by region, industry, occupation, and job training service provider, the wages, wage gains, employment rates, and training-related job placement rates at the second, fourth, eighth, and twelfth quarters
 following a person’s participation in and exit from a program.

(5) Calculating, by region, industry, occupation, and job training service provider, the rate of persons who participated in a job training service and who became employed at a wage at or above a living wage for the region. This calculation shall take into account the cost of living in the regional labor market where the person works or lives. The employment rate calculation shall be calculated at the second, fourth, eighth, and twelfth quarters following a person’s participation in and exit from a program.

(6) Calculating program completion, credential attainment, and measurable skills gains rates by job training service provider, industry, occupation, and region.

(7) Determining, by region, industry, occupation, and job training service provider,
 whether participation in a job training service, completion of a job training service, credential attainment, and measurable skills gains have an empirically verifiable impact on assisting persons in achieving employment, training-related job placement, wages, and wage gain that places those persons at or above a living wage for the region. This determination shall take into account the cost of living in the regional labor market where the person works or lives.

(8) Developing and implementing a means of working with the local workforce development boards to notify, prior to their enrollment in a job training service, a person seeking to enroll in those services of the board’s and Employment Development Department’s findings on the efficacy of those services, particularly with respect to the likelihood of training related job placement, the likelihood of job placement at or above a regional living wage, and the likelihood of wage gains at the
 second, fourth, eighth, and twelfth quarters following a person’s participation in and exit from a program. Those findings shall be disaggregated by region, job training services provider, industry, and occupation.

(9) The board and the Employment Development Department shall, in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code, submit the plan to the Legislature no later than January 1, 2024.

(c) (1) Upon appropriation by the Legislature, the Employment Development Department and the board shall implement the plan developed pursuant to subdivision (b) to meet the reporting requirements of this chapter. Two years after the appropriation, the Employment Development Department and the board shall summarize and provide to the Legislature an initial report on the status of the implementation plan and the initial findings using the available data in alignment
 with subdivision (b).

(2) The report and findings required by paragraph (1) shall be provided to the Senate Committee on Business, Professions and Economic Development, Assembly Committee on Business and Professions, Senate Committee on Education, Assembly Committee on Education, Senate Committee on Labor, Public Employment and Retirement, and Assembly Committee on Labor and Employment. The report shall not include any personally identifiable information.

(3) Following the initial report in paragraph (1), the board and Employment Development Department shall annually update and include their findings in the report required to be submitted to the Legislature by subdivision (c) of Section 14211.

(4) If any portion of the reporting requirements of this section cannot be implemented absent further statutory change, the
 remaining requirements shall continue to be in effect.

(d) For purposes of this section, both of the following definitions shall apply:

(1) “Job training services” has the same meaning as “training services,” as that term is defined in Section 3174(c)(3)(D) of Title 29 of the United States Code and the corresponding sections of the Code of Federal Regulations, and as that term is expanded on in paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 14211.

(2) “Local workforce development board” means a local workforce development board formed pursuant to Article 1 (commencing with Section 14200) of Chapter 4.

(3) “Participation in a job training service” shall mean participation in, but not necessarily completion of, the service.

(4) “Program” means a program under Title I of the federal Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act or a grant program administered by the California Workforce Development Board.

(5) “Training-related job placement” means employment in an occupation or occupations directly related to the occupation or occupations for which the job training curricula is designed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 815, Sec. 2.   (SB 755)   Effective January 1, 2023.   See conditional termination clause in Section 14007.)
-------------------------------------------

14017.2.

(a) The California Workforce Development Board shall allocate the funds appropriated to the board pursuant to paragraph (4) of subdivision (b) of Section 19.56 of the Budget Act of 2025, as amended by Assembly Bill 102 of the 2025–26 Regular Session,
 to the Los Angeles County Department of Economic Opportunity for workforce development strategies, such as education, high-road training partnerships, and other job training programs, preapprenticeships, transitional jobs, or supportive services, including stipends, for underemployed and unemployed low- to moderate-income individuals to ensure a skilled and sufficient workforce for the scale of rebuilding and recovery of areas in the Counties of Los Angeles and Ventura impacted by the 2025 wildfires and to support underemployed and unemployed low- to moderate-income workers affected by the fires. This also includes rapid response and layoff aversion, recruitment services, financial incentives, and customized training opportunities for businesses impacted by the fires and those hiring impacted workers as part of the rebuild and recovery. The funds are also for new or expanded job
 and business centers and operations near the fire zones to ensure close proximity of programs and services for dislocated and impacted workers and businesses.

(b) The Los Angeles County Department of Economic Opportunity shall reallocate six hundred thousand dollars ($600,000) to the Economic Development Collaborative to be used for the purposes specified in this section. 

(c) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), the California Workforce Development Board may use up to 5 percent of the total allocation for state administration.

(d) The California Workforce Development Board
 shall allow the Los Angeles County Department of Economic
 Opportunity to subcontract with other entities to fulfill the provisions and intent of subdivision (a).

(e) The California Workforce Development Board shall require quality standards and practices, as defined in subdivisions (s) and (t) of Section 14005.

(f) In developing and implementing workforce development strategies funded pursuant to this section, the Los Angeles County Department of Economic Opportunity
 shall focus on employment in public and private sector jobs in construction, utilities, firefighting, health care, social services, education, childcare, housing, and shelter assistance, or other areas essential to emergency response, disaster relief, recovery, rebuilding, and regional economic development and resilience.

(g) To ensure there is a direct pipeline into the workforce, individuals participating in workforce programs funded pursuant to this section shall have access to expedited licensing and certification, if feasible.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 532, Sec. 1.   (AB 338)   Effective October 10, 2025.   See conditional termination clause in Section 14007.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. State Planning and Sectors [14020. - 14020.]

14020.

(a) The California Workforce Development Board, in collaboration with state and local partners, including the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges, the State Department of Education, other appropriate state agencies, and local workforce development boards, shall develop the State Plan to serve as a framework for the development of public policy, employment services, fiscal investment, and operation of all state labor exchange, workforce education, and training programs to address the state’s economic, demographic, and workforce needs. The strategic workforce plan shall be prepared in a manner consistent with the requirements of the federal Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act of 2014.

(b) Consistent with the
 federal Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act, the State Plan shall provide a framework for state workforce policies and support sector strategies.

(c) The California Workforce Development Board shall work collaboratively with state and local partners to identify ways to eliminate systemwide barriers and better align and leverage federal, state, and local Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act funding streams, and other funding streams, and policies to develop, support, and sustain regional alliances of employers and workforce and education professionals who are working to improve the educational pipeline, establish well-articulated career pathways, provide industry-recognized credentials, certificates, and recognized postsecondary credentials, and address the career advancement needs of current and future workers in competitive and emergent industry sectors and clusters. The California Workforce Development Board and its partners shall
 work collaboratively to maximize state and local investments and pursue other resources to address the skills-gap needs identified pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (d).

(d) In order to support the requirement of the plans in subdivision (a), the California Workforce Development Board shall do the following:

(1) Identify industry sectors and industry clusters that have a competitive economic advantage and demonstrated economic importance to the state and its regional economies. In developing this analysis, the California Workforce Development Board shall consider the expertise of local workforce development boards in the state’s respective regional economies and shall encourage the local workforce development boards to identify industry sectors and industry clusters that have a competitive economic advantage and demonstrated economic importance in their respective local
 workforce development areas.

(2) Identify new dynamic emergent industry sectors and industry clusters with substantial potential to generate new jobs and income growth for the state and its regional economies. In developing this analysis, the California Workforce Development Board shall consider the expertise of local workforce development boards in the state’s respective regional economies and shall encourage the local workforce development boards to identify new dynamic emergent industry sectors and industry clusters with substantial potential to generate new jobs and income growth in their respective local workforce development areas.

(3) Provide a skills-gap analysis enumerating occupational and skills shortages in the industry sectors and industry clusters identified as having strategic importance to the state’s economy and its regional economies. In developing this analysis,
 the California Workforce Development Board shall consider the expertise of local workforce development boards in the state’s respective regional economies and shall encourage the local workforce development boards to conduct skills-gap analysis for their respective local workforce development areas. Skills-gap analysis for the state and its regional economies shall use labor market data to specify a list of high-priority, in-demand occupations for the state and its regional economies. This list shall be used to inform investment decisions and eligible training provider policies.

(4) Establish, with input from local workforce development boards and other stakeholders, initial and subsequent eligibility criteria for the federal Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act of 2014 eligible training provider list that effectively directs training resources into training programs leading to employment in high-demand, high-priority, and occupations that
 provide economic security, particularly those facing a shortage of skilled workers. The subsequent eligibility criteria, to the extent feasible, shall use performance and outcome measures to determine whether a provider is qualified to remain on the list. At a minimum, initial and subsequent eligibility criteria shall consider the following:

(A) The relevance of the training program to the workforce needs of the state’s strategic industry sectors and industry clusters.

(B) The need to plug skills gaps and skills shortages in the economy, including skills gaps and skills shortages at the state and regional level.

(C) The need to plug skills gaps and skills shortages in local workforce development areas.

(D) The likelihood that the training program will
 lead to job placement in a job providing economic security or job placement in an entry-level job that has a well-articulated career pathway or career ladder to a job providing economic security.

(E) The need for basic skills in combination with programs that provide occupational skills training for individuals with barriers to employment and those who would otherwise be unable to enter occupational skills training.

(F) To the extent feasible, utilize criteria that measure training and education provider performance, including, but not limited to, the following:

(i) Measures of skills or competency attainment.

(ii) Measures relevant to program completion, including measures of course, certificate, degree, licensure, and program of study rate of
 completion.

(iii) For those entering the labor market, measures of employment placement and retention.

(iv) For those continuing in training or education, measures of educational or training progression.

(v) For those who have entered the labor market, measures of income, including wage measures.

(G) The division of labor for making initial and subsequent eligibility determinations under this division shall be modeled on the division of labor envisioned in the federal Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act of 2014.

(H) If the state receives a waiver from the federal subsequent eligibility provisions specified in the federal Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act of 2014, the state
 workforce development board shall establish its own subsequent eligibility criteria that take into account all of the criteria specified in subparagraphs (A) to (G), inclusive.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 94, Sec. 15.   (AB 1270)   Effective January 1, 2016.   See conditional termination clause in Section 14007.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Removing Barriers to Employment Act [14030. - 14038.]

14030.

As used in this article, “Breaking Barriers to Employment Initiative” or “initiative” means the Breaking Barriers to Employment Initiative established in this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 824, Sec. 1.   (AB 1111)   Effective January 1, 2018.   See conditional termination clause in Section 14007.)
-------------------------------------------

14031.

(a) All efforts funded under this initiative are intended to supplement and be aligned with the broader workforce and education system in the State of California. The initiative is intended to focus on innovative approaches to, and proven practices for, addressing racial, ethnic, and socioeconomic disparities in the labor market.

(b) The primary purpose of the initiative is to provide individuals with barriers to employment the services they need to enter, participate in, and complete broader workforce preparation, training, and education programs aligned with regional labor market needs. Those who complete these programs should have the skills and competencies necessary to successfully
 enter the labor market, retain employment, and earn wages that lead to
 self-sufficiency, and eventually, economic mobility and security.

(c) The distinguishing characteristic of the initiative is the manner in which services will be delivered at the local and regional level. Under the initiative, services shall be delivered principally through a collaborative partnership between mission-driven, community-based organizations with experience in providing services and relevant relationships to targeted populations, consistent with the objectives of this initiative and to the populations specified, which may include, but are not limited to, faith-based, business-based, labor-based, including labor-management partnerships
 and labor-community partnerships, cultural-based, and services-based organizations, employment social enterprises, worker centers, and local workforce development boards to strengthen the America’s Job Center of California system. The role of the community-based organizations shall be to use their expertise in working with targeted populations and employers to ensure that individuals from these targeted populations receive the necessary supplemental, supportive, remedial, and wraparound services they need to successfully enter, participate in, and complete workforce and education programs and enter, be retained, and advance in the labor market. The role of local workforce development boards is to ensure a connection between community-based organizations and the America’s Job Center of California system to integrate individuals served by community-based organizations under this initiative into the education
 system and broader workforce for employment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 323, Sec. 1.   (AB 628)   Effective January 1, 2022.   See conditional termination clause in Section 14007.)
-------------------------------------------

14032.

(a) Funding for the initiative shall be subject to appropriation by the Legislature, but only for the purposes expressed in this article, and shall not draw from, supplant, or redirect existing state or federally funded education, workforce, or employment services programs, except that those funds may, but shall not be required to, be used as leverage with initiative funds.

(b) Implementation of the initiative shall be contingent upon the California Workforce Development Board notifying the Department of Finance that sufficient moneys have been appropriated by the Legislature for this purpose.

(c) Outreach shall be provided to prospective applicants, especially for small community-based organizations,
 organizations without a preexisting relationship to the local workforce boards, and organizations serving rural and small population areas.

(d) (1) Grants shall be awarded on a competitive basis.

(2) Notwithstanding any law, no more than 15 percent of all moneys appropriated by the Legislature for the award of grants under this section shall be granted to lead applicants who receive an exception under subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (f).

(e) The California Workforce Development Board shall develop criteria for the selection of grant recipients that include, but are not limited to, all of the following:

(1) Grant recipients have demonstrated experience working to ensure populations who have been historically
 disenfranchised from the labor market have access to quality jobs in their regions.

(2) Applications shall explain the community-based organization’s capacity to provide services to relevant target populations and provide evidence of this capacity.

(3) Each grant proposal shall be consistent with the purposes of the initiative.

(f) Each application shall be submitted to the California Workforce Development Board and shall, at a minimum, include all of the following:

(1) (A) Designation of a partner entity that is a lead workforce development board or community-based organization with experience in providing services consistent with the objectives of this initiative and to the populations specified, which may include, but is not
 limited to, faith-based, business-based, labor-based, including labor-management partnerships and labor-community partnerships, cultural-based, and services-based organizations.

(B) Notwithstanding subparagraph (A), an exception to the requirement of that subparagraph may be granted in instances where the lead applicant demonstrates, in writing to the California Workforce Development Board or the designated oversight authority as determined by the board, that securing a partner entity was not possible before the application deadline closed. However, the remaining criteria for the selection of grant recipients shall be required to be satisfied.

(2) The designation of one or more targeted populations that will be served by the grant.

(3) The designation of a service area, which may include one or more neighborhoods,
 local jurisdictions, regions, or statewide.

(4) An explanation of the specific purpose and goals of the grant award, the roles and responsibilities of the lead applicant and partner entities, and a discussion of how funds will be used and success will be measured, the number of individuals who will be served, and the services provided to these individuals. Documentation shall be included to demonstrate that each partnering entity has agreed to the activities in the grant proposal.

(5) A description of how the grant proposal is designed to complement the work of, and integrate the individuals being served with, the broader workforce, education, and employment system within the proposed service area, and evidence that the proposal incorporates innovative strategies or proven practices for service delivery that will lead to improved outcomes, sustainability, and systems
 improvement.

(6) A grant application may be submitted by a workforce development board or community-based organization as a single fiscal agent and may include additional partners.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 224, Sec. 1.   (AB 2873)   Effective January 1, 2025.   See conditional termination clause in Section 14007.)
-------------------------------------------

14033.

(a) The purpose of the initiative shall be to provide individuals with barriers to employment the services they need to enter, participate in, and complete broader workforce preparation, training and education programs, and, ultimately, to obtain and retain employment. Specifically, the program should strive to address racial and ethnic exclusion and inequity in the labor force and enhance racial and economic justice. Projects should create pipelines to quality jobs, upward mobility, and income security for workers historically excluded from quality jobs and economic prosperity. Special emphasis shall be given to applications that integrate individuals from target populations into career pathway programs aligned with regional labor market needs.

(b) Grants shall
 be evaluated using the following criteria:

(1) Ability to provide the services proposed in the grant to the number of individuals specified in the grant as evidenced by, among other things, whether the grantee completed the work proposed.

(2) Ability of individuals to successfully complete relevant programming funded under the grant as demonstrated by relevant measures directly related to the purpose of the program.

(3) Ability of individuals to transition into or be integrated into the broader workforce and education system as evidenced by employment and enrollment in relevant programs.

(4) Ability of individuals to succeed in both the broader workforce and education system and labor market once they transition into the broader system. This may be
 measured by tracking these individuals utilizing the existing performance monitoring systems and metrics governing relevant programs and outcomes once they transition into the broader system.

(5) Ability for program participants to inform programming on an ongoing basis and evaluate program performance and success.

(6) The degree to which program activities acknowledge and address historic racial inequity and socioeconomic barriers to labor force participation for targeted population groups.

(7) The degree to which leadership at the executive level of the lead applicant organization reflects the target populations in Section 14034.

(8) The degree to which at least 25 percent of the lead applicant organization’s staff reflects the target populations in
 Section 14034.

(c) Grant applicants shall provide all necessary information to the California Workforce Development Board, or the board’s designee, to facilitate grant performance evaluation.

(d) Grant applicants and partners may be required to participate in technical assistance activities, including, but not limited to, the convening of communities of practice to identify and help replicate evidence-based practices and to help facilitate an assessment and evaluation of grant performance and initiative success.

(e) The California Workforce Development Board shall issue a final report to be posted on its internet website. The final report shall be posted no later than one year following the completion of the program. The reports shall include, but not be limited to, the programmatic impact on the target populations,
 the fiscal savings associated with the program, key conclusions, the benefits conferred or realized using quantitative and qualitative data, demographic data, and data on the languages spoken by the populations served by the grant.

(f) If additional grant funds are appropriated to the California Workforce Development Board for the Breaking Barriers to Employment Initiative on or after July 1, 2025, the California Workforce Development Board shall produce a report evaluating grant program outcomes on the timeline prescribed in subdivision (t) of Section 14013.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 83, Sec. 24.   (SB 171)   Effective July 13, 2026.   See conditional termination clause in Section 14007.)
-------------------------------------------

14034.

Populations eligible to be served by grants include, but are not limited to, all of the following:

(a) Youths who are at risk of disconnection or disconnected from the education system or employment.

(b) Women seeking training or education to move into nontraditional fields of employment.

(c) Displaced workers and long-term unemployed.

(d) Low-wage workers.

(e) Persons for whom English is not their primary language.

(f) Economically disadvantaged persons.

(g) CalWORKs participants.

(h) Persons who are incarcerated and soon to be released or formerly incarcerated.

(i) Armed services veterans.

(j) Native Americans.

(k) Migrants or seasonal farmworkers.

(l) Persons with developmental or other disabilities.

(m) Any other population with barriers to employment identified in subdivision (j) of Section 14005.

(n) Immigrants.

(o) Persons who reside in cities that are disproportionately impacted
 by violence or are enrolled in violence prevention or mitigation programs.

(p) Persons who are victims of domestic violence or community violence.

(q) Persons over 50 years of age who need retraining for in-demand skills.

(r) Population groups with disproportionate numbers of people living in ZIP Codes of concentrated poverty.

(s) Population groups that are disproportionately impacted by occupational segregation and who are underrepresented in jobs as defined by the
 Civil Rights Department in their enforcement of the California Equal Pay Act.

(t) Populations that have been disproportionately impacted by unemployment, job interruption, and displacement during the pandemic.

(u) Persons diagnosed with autism.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 48, Sec. 75.   (SB 189)   Effective June 30, 2022.   See conditional termination clause in Section 14007.)
-------------------------------------------

14035.

Eligible activities for initiative and grant funds shall include, but are not limited to, all of the following:

(a) English language improvement training.

(b) Culturally and linguistically relevant academic enrichment, basic skills training, tutoring, and adult education.

(c) High school diploma and GED acquisition.

(d) Skills and vocational training that aligns with regional labor market needs identified as part of the California Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act regional planning process.

(e) Work experience.

(f) On-the-job training.

(g) Stipends and income and language supports for trainees.

(h) Earn and learn training.

(i) Industry certifications.

(j) Preapprenticeship programming offered in a manner that is consistent with the requirements of Section 14230, regardless of whether the preapprenticeship program funding source includes California Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act funds.

(k) Mentoring.

(l) Other remedial education and work readiness skills.

(m) Supportive services.

(n) Entrepreneurial training and support for small business development.

(o) Know-your-rights training.

(p) Mental health services, trauma-informed care, and wraparound support services. 

(q) Employer education.

(r) Activities undertaken pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 14033.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 323, Sec. 5.   (AB 628)   Effective January 1, 2022.   See conditional termination clause in Section 14007.)
-------------------------------------------

14036.

(a) The California Workforce Development Board may develop necessary policies to ensure that grants awarded under the initiative fund are activities that are consistent with the intent of this article.

(b) (1) The California Workforce Development Board may provide technical assistance to grant recipients to carry out the initiative.

(2) The California Workforce Development Board may provide technical assistance by contract with a nonprofit organization. If the California Workforce Development Board contracts with a nonprofit organization, the California Workforce Development Board shall do both of the following:

(A) Develop criteria for the selection of the nonprofit organization.

(B) Award the contract through a transparent and competitive process, which shall include, but not be limited to, solicitation of proposals and evaluation of proposals through the criteria developed pursuant to subparagraph (A).

(c) For the purposes of this section, “nonprofit organization” means any private, nonprofit organization that qualifies under Section 501(c)(3) of the United States Internal Revenue Code of 1986.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 224, Sec. 3.   (AB 2873)   Effective January 1, 2025.   See conditional termination clause in Section 14007.)
-------------------------------------------

14037.

There is hereby created in the State Treasury the Breaking Barriers to Employment Initiative Fund. All moneys in the fund shall be available, upon appropriation by the Legislature, to carry out this article in support of the initiative. Subject to the approval of the Department of Finance, all moneys appropriated, or those collected or received from gifts, bequests, or donations, shall be deposited in the Breaking Barriers to Employment Initiative Fund in accordance with the terms of the gift or donation from which the moneys are derived and in accordance with Sections 8647, 11005, 11005.1, and 16302 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 824, Sec. 1.   (AB 1111)   Effective January 1, 2018.   See conditional termination clause in Section 14007.)
-------------------------------------------

14038.
